Illinois, session 104th, HB3861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital Development 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to Lamb's Farm, Inc., for capital improvements. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92025.